Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-551
State Fire Marshal; duties; powers.

The duties and powers of the State Fire Marshal and of his or her deputies and assistants prescribed in sections 81-509 to 81-523, 81-526, 81-527, 81-531 to 81-538, and 81-5,151 to 81-5,157 and the Petroleum Products and Hazardous Substances Storage and Handling Act shall not be applicable to the Nebraska Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1969.

Laws 1969, c. 763, § 13, p. 2892;

Laws 1986, LB 217, § 14;

Laws 1988, LB 893, § 17;

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 85.

Petroleum Products and Hazardous Substances Storage and Handling Act, see section 81-15,117.